Utah statutes.
34-28-13.   Assignment of wage claims -- Powers of division.

(1)  The division may take assignments of wage claims, rights of actions for penalties under Section 34-28-5, mechanics' and other liens of workers and rights of action against sureties, without being bound to any of the technical rules with reference to the validity of the assignments.

(2)  The division may prosecute actions for the collection of claims which are valid and enforceable in the courts.  The division may join various claimants in one preferred claim or lien, and in case of suit to join them in one cause of action.

